Utah statutes.
32B-4-505.   Obstructing a search, official proceeding, or investigation.

(1)  A person who is in the premises or has charge over premises may not refuse or fail to admit to the premises or obstruct the entry of any of the following who demands entry when acting under this title:

(a)  a commissioner;

(b)  an authorized representative of the commission or department; or

(c)  a law enforcement officer.

(2)  A person who is in the premises or has charge of the premises may not interfere with any of the following who is conducting an investigation under this title at the premises:

(a)  a commissioner;

(b)  an authorized representative of the commission or department; or

(c)  a law enforcement officer.

(3)  A person is guilty of a second degree felony if, believing that an official proceeding or investigation is pending or about to be instituted under this title, that person:

(a)  alters, destroys, conceals, or removes a record with a purpose to impair its verity or availability in the proceeding or investigation; or

(b)  makes, presents, or uses anything that the person knows to be false with a purpose to deceive any of the following who may be engaged in a proceeding or investigation under this title:

(i)  a commissioner;

(ii)  an authorized representative of the commission or department;

(iii)  a law enforcement officer; or

(iv)  other person.

